Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2530.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2321(b.1)(1), (2) and (3) and (c) of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (b.1) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 2321. Expungement.* * *(b.1) Expungement by court order.--The following shall apply:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a person may, at no cost, request the court of common pleas of the county where the original charges were filed to issue an order directing the expungement of the DNA sample, record or profile pertaining to the person in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base [in the following instances:123456789101112131415161718 (i) the conviction or delinquency adjudication for which the person's DNA sample was collected has been reversed and no appeal is pending;(ii) the person was granted an unconditional pardon for the crime for which the DNA sample was taken; or(iii) the DNA sample, record or profile was included in the State DNA Data Bank or State DNA Data Base by mistake and the State Police has erroneously refused to grant the person's request for removal under subsection (b).] if the DNA sample, record or profile was included in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base by mistake and the State Police has erroneously refused to grant the person's request for removal under subsection (b) or if the DNA sample, record or profile was eligible for expungement under paragraph (1.1) but the court did not issue an order under paragraph (1.2) or (1.3) . (1.1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the court of common pleas of the county where the original charges were filed shall automatically issue an order directing the expungement of the DNA sample, record or profile pertaining to the person in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base if any of the following apply:(i) The conviction or delinquency adjudication for which the person's DNA sample was collected has been reversed and no appeal is pending.(ii) The person was granted an unconditional pardon for the crime for which the DNA sample was taken.(1.2) The clerk of courts shall provide notice to the president judge when a record is returned in a case resulting in the reversal of a conviction or adjudication. Upon receipt 20260HB2530PN3430 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the notice, the president judge shall determine whether the person is eligible for expungement under paragraphs (1.1) and (2) and, if the person is eligible, shall automatically issue an order directing the expungement.(1.3) On a quarterly basis, the Board of Pardons shall transmit notice of each unconditional pardon that may make a person eligible for expungement under paragraph (1.1)(ii) to the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts. On a quarterly basis, upon receipt of the notice, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall transmit the notice to the court of common pleas of the county where the original charges were filed. Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall determine whether the person is eligible for expungement under paragraphs (1.1) and (2) and, if the person is eligible, shall automatically issue an order directing the expungement.(2) [Paragraph (1)] Paragraphs (1), (1.1), (1.2) and (1.3) shall not apply if the person has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent for any other crime for which a DNA sample is required to be collected under this chapter.(3) The court shall give 10 days' prior notice to the district attorney of the county where the original charges were filed of an application for expungement under [this subsection] paragraph (1).* * *(c) Limitations.--(1) An incarcerated or previously incarcerated person may not seek expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile [on the ground that that] under subsection (b.1)(1), nor may the court automatically issue an order directing the 20260HB2530PN3430 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile under subsection (b.1)(1.1), (1.2) or (1.3), on the ground that the person was convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a felony sex offense prior to July 27, 1995.(2) A person may not seek expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile [on the ground that that] under subsection (b.1)(1), nor may the court automatically issue an order directing the expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile under subsection (b.1)(1.1), (1.2) or (1.3), on the ground that the person was convicted or adjudicated delinquent for one of the other specified offenses prior to the effective date of the former DNA Act or this chapter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2530PN3430 - 4 - 1234567891011121314